Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-2201 to 85-2229 shall be known and may be cited as the Community College Foundation and Equalization Aid Act.

Laws 2007, LB342, § 1.
June 30, 2011